North Dakota, session 69, SB2084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 44-08-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. For travel within the state, the following rates for each quarter of any twenty-four-hour period
must be used:
a. First quarter is from six a.m. to twelve noon and the sum must be nine dollars. First
quarter reimbursement may not be made if travel began after seven a.m.
b. Second quarter is from twelve noon to six p.m. and the sum must be fourteen dollars.
c. Third quarter is from six p.m. to twelve midnight and the sum must be twenty-two dollars.
d. Fourth quarter is from twelve midnight to six a.m. and the sum must be the actual lodging
expenses not to exceed an amount established by policy by the director of the office of
management and budget plus any additional applicable state or local taxes. The director
shall establish a policy to set the lodging reimbursement at an amount equal to ninety
percent of the rate established by the United States general services administration for
lodging reimbursement in this state. A political subdivision may reimburse an elective or
appointive officer, employee, representative, or agent for actual lodging expenses.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 44-08-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
6. The allowance for in - state lodging must be equal to the United States general services
administration lodging rate for the North Dakota city for which the lodging claim is made, plus
any additional applicable state or local taxes. The director shall establish a policy to set the
lodging allowance in instances when the United States general services administration lodging
rate is not available. The allowance for lodging outside the state must be the actual lodging
expense.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 54-03-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. a. Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive reimbursement for lodging,
which may not exceed per calendar month the amount established under this subdivision
by the director of the office of management and budget for lodging in state and which
may not exceed the rate provided in section 44-08-04 for each calendar day during the
period of any organizational, special, or regular session. On August first of each
even-numbered year, the director of the office of management and budget shall set the
maximum monthly reimbursement for the subsequent two-year period at an amount
equal to thirty times seventy-five percent of the daily lodging reimbursement in effect on
that date as provided under subdivision d of subsection 26 of section 44-08-04.

S. B. NO. 2084 - PAGE 2
b. Notwithstanding subdivision a:
(1) A member of the legislative assembly may elect to be reimbursed for less than the
amount to which the legislator is entitled under this subsection by claiming the
lesser amount on a voucher submitted with the receipt required by section
44-08-04.
(2) The legislative management may establish guidelines that may result in a reduced
maximum reimbursement for a single dwelling in which two or more legislators
share lodging and the total rent for that dwelling exceeds the amount to which a
legislator is entitled under subdivision a.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 54-06-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
5. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, state employees permanently located
outside the state or on assignments outside the state for an indefinite period of time,
exceeding at least thirty consecutive days, must be allowed and paid forty-five centsUnited
States general services administration mileage rate per mile [1.61 kilometers] for each mile
[1.61 kilometers] actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of official duty when
such travel is by motor vehicle, and the three-hundred-mile [482.80-kilometer] restriction
imposed by subsection 3 does not apply.

S. B. NO. 2084 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2084.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 72 Nays 21 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State